Hawaii statutes.
§633-32 Evidence. In a case tried in
the small claims division, the court shall conduct the trial in such manner as
to do substantial justice between the parties according to the rules of
substantive law, and is not bound by the rules of evidence, whether or not set
out by statute, except provisions relating to privileged communications. [L
1970, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144, §25]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next